Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 1. General Powers.

Sec. 29.35.010.
General powers.

All municipalities have the following general powers, subject to other provisions of law:

to establish and prescribe a salary for an elected or appointed municipal official or employee;

to combine two or more appointive or administrative offices;

to establish and prescribe the functions of a municipal department, office, or agency;

to require periodic and special reports from a municipal department to be submitted through the mayor;

to investigate an affair of the municipality and make inquiries into the conduct of a municipal department;

to levy a tax or special assessment, and impose a lien for its enforcement;

to enforce an ordinance and to prescribe a penalty for violation of an ordinance;

to acquire, manage, control, use, and dispose of real and personal property, whether the property is situated inside or outside the municipal boundaries; this power includes the power of a borough to expend, for any purpose authorized by law, money received from the disposal of land in a service area established under AS

29.35.450

;

to expend money for a community purpose, facility, or service for the good of the municipality to the extent the municipality is otherwise authorized by law to exercise the power necessary to accomplish the purpose or provide the facility or service;

to regulate the operation and use of a municipal right-of-way, facility, or service;

to borrow money and issue evidences of indebtedness;

to acquire membership in an organization that promotes legislation for the good of the municipality;

to enter into an agreement, including an agreement for cooperative or joint administration of any function or power with a municipality, the state, or the United States;

to sue and be sued;

to provide facilities or services for the confinement and care of prisoners and enter into agreements with the state, another municipality, or any person relating to the confinement and care of prisoners;

to receive grants from and contract with the Department of Public Safety under AS

18.65.670

;

to provide by ordinance for the creation, recording, and notice of a lien on real or personal property to secure payment of past due utility fees, costs incurred by the municipality in the abatement of an unsafe or dangerous building, and other fees and charges provided for by ordinance; except as otherwise provided by state law, when recorded, a municipal lien under this paragraph has priority over all other liens except

liens for property taxes, special assessments, and sales and use taxes;

liens that were perfected before the recording of the lien under this paragraph;

liens that, under state law, are prior, paramount, and superior to all other liens; and

mechanics’ and materialmen’s liens for which claims of lien under AS

34.35.070

or notices of right to lien under AS

34.35.064

have been recorded before the recording of the lien under this paragraph.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 15 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 49 SLA 2009; am § 3 ch 9 SLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For suits against municipalities, see AS

09.65.070

; for powers of a municipality to control use and occupancy of dwellings, see AS

18.55.930

.

Administrative Code. —

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective October 5, 2009, added (16).

The 2017 amendment, effective June 13, 2017, added (17).

Sec. 29.35.015.
Investment pools.

A municipality may invest money in investment pools for public entities as authorized under AS 37.23 only if that municipality has obtained the consent of its governing body through an ordinance authorizing the participation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 66 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.020.
Extraterritorial jurisdiction.

To the extent a municipality is otherwise authorized by law to exercise the power necessary to provide the facility or service, the municipality may provide facilities for the confinement and care of prisoners, parks, playgrounds, cemeteries, emergency medical services, solid and septic waste disposal, utility services, airports, streets (including ice roads), trails, transportation facilities, wharves, harbors and other marine facilities outside its boundaries and may regulate their use and operation to the extent that the jurisdiction in which they are located does not regulate them. A regulation adopted under this section must state that it applies outside the municipality.

A municipality may adopt an ordinance to exercise a power authorized by this subsection and may enforce the ordinance outside its boundaries. Before a power authorized by this subsection may be exercised inside the boundaries of another municipality, the approval of the other municipality must be given by ordinance, and before a power authorized by this subsection may be exercised inside a village, as that term is defined by AS

46.08.900

, the approval of the village must be given by resolution. A municipality intending to exercise its authority under this subsection shall act by ordinance, and may adopt an ordinance under this subsection to

protect its water supply and watershed; or

contain, clean up, or prevent the release or threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance that may pose an imminent or substantial threat to persons, property, or natural resources within the municipality’s boundaries; however, this paragraph does not authorize a municipality to enforce an ordinance outside its boundaries to regulate exploration, development, production, or transportation of oil, gas, or minerals in a manner inconsistent with the state’s management of those resources, and enforcement of the ordinance must be consistent with a regional master plan prepared by the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS

46.04.210

; in this paragraph, “natural resources” has the meaning given in AS

46.03.826

.

A municipality may enter into agreements with the United States Coast Guard, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and other persons relating to development and enforcement of vessel traffic control and monitoring systems for oil barges and tank vessels carrying oil operating in or near the waters of the state.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

In this section, “village”

means the area within a five-mile radius of the village post office or, if there is no post office, another site designated by the commissioner;

does not include an area described in (1) of this subsection that is within a city or another village.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 191 SLA 1990; am §§ 2, 3 ch 83 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 15 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was formerly subsection (d) and subsection (d) was formerly subsection (c).
Relettered in 1991.

Sec. 29.35.030.
Eminent domain.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a municipality may, only within its boundaries, exercise the powers of eminent domain and declaration of taking in the performance of a power or function of the municipality under the procedures set out in AS

09.55.250

—

09.55.460

. In the case of a second class city, the exercise of the power of eminent domain or declaration of taking must be by ordinance that is submitted to the voters at the next general election or at a special election called for that purpose. A majority of the votes on the question is required for approval of the ordinance.

The power of eminent domain may not be exercised to acquire private property from a private person for the purpose of transferring title to the property to another private person for economic development, except as provided by AS

09.55.240(d)(1)

— (6), and may not be exercised for purposes expressed in AS

09.55.240(e)

.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

In this section,

“economic development” has the meaning given in AS

09.55.240

;

“private person” has the meaning given in AS

09.55.240

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 4, 5 ch 84 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as (c) and relettered in 2006, at which time subsection (b) was relettered as (c) and an internal reference was conformed.

Sec. 29.35.040.
Emergency disaster powers.

A municipality that is wholly or partially in an area that is declared by the President or governor to be a disaster area may participate in and provide for housing, urban renewal, and redevelopment in the same manner as a home rule city. The exercise of these powers by a borough shall be on a nonareawide basis, except a borough may exercise the powers transferred to it by a city as provided by AS

29.35.310

.

Powers granted by this section must be initiated within a period of not more than five years after the date of declaration of a natural disaster by the President or governor, but these powers may be extended for an additional period of not more than three years.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.35.050.
Garbage and solid waste services.

Notwithstanding AS

29.35.200

—

29.35.220

, a municipality may by ordinance

provide for the establishment, maintenance, and operation of a system of garbage and solid waste collection and disposal for the entire municipality, or for districts or portions of it;

require all persons in the municipality or district to use the system and to dispose of their garbage and solid waste as provided in the ordinance;

award contracts for collection and disposal, or provide for the collection and disposal of garbage and solid waste by municipal officials and employees;

pay for garbage and solid waste collection and disposal from available money;

require property owners or occupants of premises to use the garbage and solid waste collection and disposal system provided by the municipality;

fix charges against the property owners or occupants of premises for the collection and disposal; and

provide penalties for violations of the ordinances.

The governing body of a municipality may not prohibit a person holding a valid certificate from the former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or from the Regulatory Commission of Alaska from continuing to collect and dispose of garbage, refuse, trash, or other waste material, or provide other related services in an area in the municipality if the certificate authorizes the collection and disposal of garbage, refuse, trash, or other waste material and providing of other services in the area, and the certificate was originally issued before the municipality provided similar services. Except as provided in (c) of this section, a municipality may not provide for a garbage, refuse, trash, or other waste material collection and disposal service in an area to the extent it lies in an area granted to a garbage, refuse, trash, or other waste material carrier by a certificate issued by the former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska to the carrier until it has purchased the certificate, equipment, and facilities of the carrier, or that portion of the certificate that would be affected, at fair market value. A municipality may exercise the right of eminent domain to acquire the certificate, equipment, and facilities of the carrier, or that portion of the certificate that would be affected.

A municipality may establish an intermediate transfer site for the collection and disposal of garbage, refuse, trash, or other waste material without purchasing the certificate, equipment, or facilities of a waste material carrier certificated by the former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska. The municipality may, without compensating a certificated waste carrier operating in the area, provide for or contract with a certificated or noncertificated entity to provide for the collection and disposal of waste material left at the intermediate transfer site.

A municipality that owns or operates a landfill or dumping area for the disposal of waste material may, by ordinance, partially or totally exempt from a fee for the use of the landfill or dumping area the disposal of waste material generated from the substantial rehabilitation, renovation, demolition, removal, or replacement of a structure on deteriorated property. The exemption may apply to some or all types of deteriorated property, as provided in the ordinance. An ordinance adopted under this subsection must include specific eligibility requirements and require a written application for the fee exemption. In this subsection, “deteriorated property” has the meaning given in AS

29.45.050

.

Subsections (a) — (c) of this section apply to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 1, 2 ch 176 SLA 1990; am § 38 ch 21 SLA 1991; am §§ 2, 3 ch 40 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as subsection (d) and relettered in 1990, at which time former subsection (c) was relettered as subsection (d).

In 1999, in subsection (b) “from the former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or from the Regulatory Commission of Alaska” and “by the former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska” were substituted for “from the Alaska Public Utilities Commission” and “by the Alaska Public Utilities Commission”, respectively, as a result of § 30(c), ch. 25, SLA 1999.
Also, in subsection (c) “by the former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “by the Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(c), ch. 25, SLA 1999.

Subsection (c) was enacted as subsection (d) and relettered in 1990, at which time former subsection (c) was relettered as subsection (d).
Subsection (d) was enacted as subsection (e) and relettered in 2009, at which time former subsection (d) was relettered as subsection (e).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective September 18, 2009, in (d) [now (e)], substituted “Subsections (a) — (c) of this section apply” for “This section applies”; added (e) [now (d)].

Sec. 29.35.055.
Local air quality control program.

A municipality may establish a local air quality control program as provided in AS

46.14.400

only if the municipality has obtained the consent of its governing body through an ordinance authorizing the participation. This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 6 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Sec. 29.35.060.
Franchises and permits.

The assembly acting for the area outside all cities in the borough and the council acting for the area in a city may grant franchises, including exclusive franchise privileges, to a person, corporation, organization, or utility not certificated by the former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska and may permit the use of streets and other public places by the franchise holder under regulations prescribed by ordinance.

Unless the grant is made on a competitive basis, the grant of an exclusive right to use a public street or right-of-way for more than five years to a utility or a transportation system not certificated by the former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska shall be valid only if approved by a majority of the voters at an election.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in subsections (a) and (b) “by the former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “by the Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(c), ch. 25, SLA 1999.

Collateral references. —

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Franchises from Public Entities, § 1 et seq.

64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 968, 1473 — 1503.

Municipality’s liability in damages for refusal to grant franchise. 37 ALR2d 694.

Sec. 29.35.070.
Public utilities.

The assembly acting for the area outside all cities in the borough and the council acting for the area in a city may regulate, fix, establish, and change the rates and charges imposed for a utility service provided to the municipality or its inhabitants by a utility that is not subject to regulation under AS 42.05 unless that utility is exempted from regulation under AS

42.05.711(a)

, (d) — (k), (o), (p), (r), or (u).

A municipality may provide for a reasonable deposit for meters and service to be given if interest is paid on the deposit.

Unless the utility is owned by the municipality, all rates, charges, and regulations established under this section shall be established by ordinance and shall be reasonable and permit a fair return on invested capital.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 93 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 2019)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in subsection (a) “AS

42.05.141

” was substituted for “AS

42.05.010

” to reflect the 1999 repeal of former AS

42.05.010

— 42.05.131.

In 2010, in (a) of this section, “or (r)” was substituted for “or (q)” to reflect the 2010 relettering of that subsection.

In 2016, in subsection (a) “42.05.141 — 42.05.712, 42.05.990, or 42.05.995” was substituted for “42.05.141 — 42.05.721” to reflect the 1990 renumbering of 42.05.720 as 42.05.990 and 42.05.721 as 42.05.995.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective August 31, 2010, in (a), added “or (r)” preceding “or is exempted under regulations” and made a related stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment, effective November 27, 2019, substituted “(p), (r), or (u)” for “(p), or (r), or is exempted under regulations adopted under AS

42.05.810

from complying with all or part of AS

42.05.141

–

42.05.712

,

42.05.990

, or

42.05.995

” at the end of (a).

Sec. 29.35.080.
Alcoholic beverages.

A municipality may regulate the possession, barter, sale, importation, and consumption of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.480

—

04.11.509

and AS

04.21.010

.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 17 ch 80 SLA 1986; am § 66 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Sec. 29.35.085.
Curfew.

A municipality may, by ordinance, provide for a curfew for persons under 18 years of age for whom the disabilities of minority have not been removed for general purposes under AS

09.55.590

and who have not arrived at the age of majority under AS

25.20.020

.

Notwithstanding AS

29.25.070(a)

, for a violation of this section, the court may impose a fine of not more than $250.

The community work provisions of AS

47.12.030(b)(6)

apply to punishment for a minor’s conviction of a violation of a curfew ordinance for which a penalty is provided under AS

29.25.070(a)

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1997)

Sec. 29.35.090.
Municipal property; rights-of-way.

The governing body shall by ordinance establish a formal procedure for acquisition and disposal of land and interests in land by the municipality.

Notwithstanding AS

29.40.160

or other provisions of law, a municipality may not vacate a right-of-way acquired by the state under former 43 U.S.C. 932. This subsection applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 94 SLA 1999)

Collateral references. —

Power of municipal corporation to lease or sublet property owned or leased by it. 47 ALR3d 19.

Sec. 29.35.100.
Budget and capital program.

The governing body shall establish the manner for the preparation and submission of the budget and capital program. After a public hearing, the governing body may approve the budget with or without amendments, and shall appropriate the money required for the approved budget.

The governing body may make supplemental and emergency appropriations. Payment may not be authorized or made and an obligation may not be incurred except in accordance with appropriations.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.35.110.
Expenditure of borough revenues.

Borough revenues received through taxes collected on an areawide basis by the borough may be expended on general administrative costs and on areawide functions only. Borough revenues received through taxes collected on a nonareawide basis may be expended on general administrative costs and functions that render service only to the area outside all cities in the borough.

Use of borough revenues from a sales tax levied upon room rentals for a tourism marketing campaign is not subject to (a) of this section.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a borough that has entered into an agreement with a city located in the borough to cooperatively or jointly provide for economic development may use borough revenue from taxes, whether collected on an areawide or nonareawide basis, to carry out the terms of the agreement.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 2004)

Sec. 29.35.120.
Annual audit.

The governing body shall provide for an annual independent audit of the accounts and financial transactions of the municipality or, in the case of a second class city, an audit or statement of annual income and expenditures. To make the audit the governing body shall designate a public accountant who has no personal interest, direct or indirect, in the fiscal affairs of the municipality. Copies of the audit shall be available to the public upon request.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.35.125.
Fees for police protection services.

A municipality may by ordinance impose a fee on the owner of residential property, including multi-family housing, if a member of the municipal police department goes to the property an excessive number of times during a calendar year in response to a call for assistance, a complaint, an emergency, or a potential emergency. The number of responses considered to be excessive and the amount of the fee shall be set out in the ordinance that establishes the fee. The fee may not exceed the actual cost to the municipality for the excessive responses. A fee may not be imposed under this subsection for responses to calls that involve potential child neglect, potential domestic violence, as defined in AS

18.66.990

, or potential stalking under AS

11.41.260

or

11.41.270

.

An ordinance enacted under this section shall require actual notice to the property owner of police contacts and a warning that failure to take appropriate corrective action may result in the imposition of a fee. The ordinance must also define “appropriate corrective action” to include written notice to quit under AS

09.45.100

—

09.45.110

in appropriate situations as well as other types of corrective action, and provide that the property owner is not liable for the fee if that action is promptly taken.

A municipality may provide that a fee imposed under (a) of this section is a lien on the property to which the municipal police have been called an excessive number of times and may provide for the recording and notice of the lien. When recorded, a lien under this subsection has priority over all other liens except

liens for property taxes, special assessments, and sales and use taxes;

liens that were perfected before the recording of the lien under this subsection; and

mechanics’ and materialmen’s liens for which claims of lien under AS

34.35.070

or notices of right to lien under AS

34.35.064

have been recorded before the recording of the lien under this subsection.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 111 SLA 2002)

Sec. 29.35.130.
Emergency services communications centers.

A municipality may establish an emergency services communications center with one or more other municipalities and one or more state, federal, or private agencies that provide emergency service communications to the same geographic area. An emergency services communications center established under this section may be organized and operated as a public nonprofit corporation under AS 10.20.

An emergency services communications center under this section may be governed by a board of directors. A member of a board of directors of an emergency services communications center serves without compensation but is entitled to per diem and travel expenses. If an emergency services communications center is organized as a nonprofit corporation, a member of its board of directors may not be employed by the nonprofit corporation.

An emergency services communications center may assess the feasibility and desirability of providing emergency services communications for the geographic area in which it is located through one central office. An emergency services communications center may

combine or coordinate the existing emergency services communications programs of the participating municipalities and agencies;

operate a dispatch center to receive all requests for emergency services and dispatch those services;

study the need for improvement in the timely delivery of emergency services to residents of the participating municipalities;

hold public hearings to obtain information concerning the timely delivery of emergency services;

apply for and accept federal, state, municipal, and private money, property, or assistance for use in providing the timely delivery of emergency services;

enter into contracts to carry out the provisions of this section;

employ personnel necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

In this section,

“emergency services” means services provided by law enforcement agencies, fire departments, ambulance services, and other organizations that are intended to respond to emergency situations of imminent danger to life or property;

“state agency” means a department, division, or office in the executive branch of state government.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.35.131.
911 surcharge.

A municipality may, by resolution or ordinance, elect to provide an enhanced 911 system at public safety answering points and may purchase or lease the enhanced 911 equipment or service required to establish or maintain an enhanced 911 system at public safety answering points from a local exchange telephone company or other qualified vendor. The municipality may impose an enhanced 911 surcharge within the enhanced 911 service area. An enhanced 911 surcharge may not exceed $2 per month for each wireless telephone number and $2 per month for each local exchange access line for wireline telephones. The maximum surcharge amount of $2 provided for in this subsection may be increased above that level if the surcharge amount is approved by the voters of the enhanced 911 service area. The amount of surcharge imposed for each wireless telephone number must equal the amount imposed for each local exchange access line for a wireline telephone. An enhanced 911 service area may be all of a city, all of a unified municipality, or all or part of the area within a borough and may include the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality in accordance with AS

29.35.020

. The governing body of a municipality shall review an enhanced 911 surcharge annually to determine whether the current level of the surcharge is adequate, excessive, or insufficient to meet anticipated enhanced 911 system needs. When a municipality imposes an enhanced 911 surcharge or the amount of the surcharge is changed, the municipality shall notify in writing the telephone customers subject to the surcharge and provide an explanation of what the surcharge will be used for.

A local exchange telephone company providing service in a municipality that has imposed an enhanced 911 surcharge shall bill each month and collect the surcharge from customers in the enhanced 911 service area. A wireless telephone company that provides telephone service to wireless telephone customers with billing addresses within the enhanced 911 service area shall impose an enhanced 911 surcharge each month and collect the surcharge from customers in the enhanced 911 service area. A local exchange telephone customer may not be subject to more than one enhanced 911 surcharge on a local exchange access line for a wireline telephone. A wireless telephone customer may not be subject to more than one enhanced 911 surcharge for each wireless telephone number. A customer that has more than 100 local exchange access lines from a local exchange telephone company in the municipality is liable for the enhanced 911 surcharge only on 100 local exchange access lines.

A local exchange telephone company or wireless telephone company shall include the appropriate enhanced 911 surcharge, stated separately and included in the total amount owed, in the bills delivered to its customers. The Regulatory Commission of Alaska may not consider the enhanced 911 surcharge as revenue of the telephone company and has no jurisdiction over an enhanced 911 system. A customer is liable for payment of the enhanced 911 surcharge in the amounts billed by the telephone company until the amounts have been paid to the telephone company.

A local exchange telephone company or wireless telephone company that has collected the enhanced 911 surcharge shall remit the amounts collected to the municipality no later than 60 days after the end of the month in which the amount was collected. From each remittance made in a timely manner under this subsection, the telephone company is entitled to deduct and retain the greater of one percent of the collected amount or $150 as the cost of administration for collecting the enhanced 911 surcharge. In addition, a wireless telephone company is entitled to full recovery of the recurring and nonrecurring costs associated with implementation and operation of Phase I E911 service as allowed under Federal Communications Commission proceedings entitled “Revision of the Commission’s Rules to Ensure Compatibility with Enhanced 9-1-1 Emergency Calling Systems” (CC Docket No. 94-102; RM-8143).

A local exchange telephone company or wireless telephone company is not obligated to take legal action to enforce collection of the enhanced 911 surcharge. However, if a telephone company is attempting to collect an unpaid debt from a customer, the telephone company shall also attempt to collect any unpaid enhanced 911 surcharge that the customer owes. If a customer pays a portion of a bill that includes an enhanced 911 surcharge, the amount paid shall be prorated between the telephone company and the enhanced 911 surcharge. The telephone company shall annually provide the municipality with a list of the amounts due for the nonpayment of enhanced 911 surcharges, together with the names and addresses of those customers who carry a balance that can be determined by the telephone company to be for the nonpayment of the enhanced 911 surcharges. The telephone company is not liable for uncollected amounts.

The municipality may, at its own expense, require an annual audit of a local exchange telephone company’s or wireless telephone company’s books and records concerning the collection and remittance of the enhanced 911 surcharge.

A village, as defined in AS

09.65.070(e)

, or a public corporation established by a municipality has the powers granted to a municipality under this section.

[Repealed, § 6 ch 55 SLA 2005.]

A municipality may only use the enhanced 911 surcharge revenue for those costs of the enhanced 911 system that are authorized in this subsection. The surcharge revenue may not be used for any capital or operational costs for emergency responses that occur after the call is dispatched to the emergency responder. The surcharge revenue may not be used for constructing buildings, leasing buildings, maintaining buildings, or renovating buildings, except for the modification of an existing building to the extent that is necessary to maintain the security and environmental integrity of the public safety answering point and equipment rooms. The surcharge revenue may be used for the following costs to the extent the costs are directly attributable to the establishment, maintenance, and operation of an enhanced 911 system:

the acquisition, implementation, and maintenance of public safety answering point equipment and 911 service features;

the acquisition, installation, and maintenance of other equipment, including call answering equipment, call transfer equipment, automatic number identification controllers and displays, automatic location identification controllers and displays, station instruments, 911 telecommunications systems, teleprinters, logging recorders, instant playback recorders, telephone devices for the deaf, public safety answering point backup power systems, consoles, automatic call distributors, and hardware and software interfaces for computer-aided dispatch systems;

the salaries and associated expenses for 911 call takers for that portion of time spent taking and transferring 911 calls;

training costs for public safety answering point call takers in the proper methods and techniques used in taking and transferring 911 calls;

expenses required to develop and maintain all information necessary to properly inform call takers as to location address, type of emergency, and other information directly relevant to the 911 call-taking and transferring function, including automatic location identification and automatic number identification databases.

If a city in an enhanced 911 service area established by a borough incurs costs described under (i) of this section for the enhanced 911 system, before the borough may use revenue from an enhanced 911 surcharge, the borough and city must execute an agreement addressing the duties and responsibilities of each for the enhanced 911 system and establishing priorities for the use of the surcharge revenue. If the Department of Public Safety also provides services as part of the enhanced 911 system or uses the enhanced 911 system in that enhanced 911 service area, the department must be a party to the agreement.

For purposes of (i) of this section, “call taker” means a person employed in a primary or secondary answering point whose duties include the initial answering of 911 or enhanced 911 calls and routing the calls to the agency or dispatch center responsible for dispatching appropriate emergency services and a person in a primary or secondary answering point whose duties include receiving a 911 or enhanced 911 call either directly or routed from another answering point and dispatching appropriate emergency services in response to the call; the term “call taker” is synonymous with the term “dispatcher” in that it is inclusive of the functions of both answering the 911 or enhanced 911 calls and dispatching emergency services in response to the calls.

History.

(§ 4 ch 57 SLA 1993; am §§ 1 — 6 ch 82 SLA 2001; am §§ 2, 3, 6 ch 55 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in subsection (c) “Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(a), ch. 25, SLA 1999.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective September 22, 2005, rewrote subsection (a), repealed subsection (h), and added subsections (i) — (k).

Sec. 29.35.133.
Immunity for 911 systems.

The establishment, funding, use, operation, or maintenance of enhanced 911 systems and all activities associated with those actions are specifically found to be within the ambit of AS

09.50.250

(1) and AS

09.65.070(d)(6)

. Except for intentional acts of misconduct or gross negligence, a service supplier, local exchange telephone company, or wireless telephone company and their employees and agents are also immune from tort liability that might otherwise be incurred in the course of installing, training, maintaining, or providing enhanced 911 systems or transmitting or receiving calls on the system.

An individual, telephone company, or employee of a telephone company who operates or maintains an emergency 911 service is not liable for civil damages in a tort action as a result of an act, omission, failure of service, or incorrect information done or given in good faith.

In this section, “service supplier” means a person that provides or offers to provide telecommunications equipment or services necessary for the establishment, maintenance, or operation of an enhanced 911 system.

History.

(§ 4 ch 57 SLA 1993; am § 7 ch 82 SLA 2001)